Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 12. Collection of Personal Property by Affidavit and Summary Administration Procedure.

Sec. 13.16.680.
Collection of personal property by affidavit.

Thirty days after the death of a decedent, any person indebted to the decedent or having possession of tangible personal property or an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action belonging to the decedent shall make payment of the indebtedness or deliver the tangible personal property or an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action to a person claiming to be the successor of the decedent upon being presented an affidavit made by or on behalf of the successor stating that

the entire estate, wherever located, less liens and encumbrances, consists only of not more than

vehicles subject to registration under AS

28.10.011

with a total value that does not exceed $100,000; and

personal property, other than vehicles described in (A) of this paragraph, that does not exceed $50,000;

30 days have elapsed since the death of the decedent;

no application or petition for the appointment of a personal representative is pending or has been granted in any jurisdiction; and

the claiming successor is entitled to payment or delivery of the property.

A transfer agent of any security shall change the registered ownership on the books of a corporation from the decedent to the successor or successors upon the presentation of an affidavit as provided in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 37(a), ch. 100, SLA 2008, provides that the 2008 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to a decedent if the decedent dies on or after September 15, 2008.”

Sec. 13.16.685.
Effect of affidavit.

The person paying, delivering, transferring, or issuing personal property or the evidence of it under affidavit is discharged and released to the same extent as if the person dealt with a personal representative of the decedent.
The person is not required to see to the application of the personal property or evidence of it or to inquire into the truth of any statement in the affidavit.
If any person to whom an affidavit is delivered refuses to pay, deliver, transfer, or issue any personal property or evidence of it, it may be recovered or its payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance compelled upon proof of their right in a proceeding brought for the purpose by or on behalf of the persons entitled to it.
Any person to whom payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance is made is answerable and accountable for it to any personal representative of the estate or to any other person having a superior right.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.690.
Small estates; summary administrative procedure.

If it appears from the inventory and appraisal that the value of the entire estate, less liens and encumbrances, does not exceed homestead allowance, exempt property, family allowance, costs and expenses of administration, reasonable funeral expenses, and reasonable and necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last illness of the decedent, the personal representative, without giving notice to creditors, may immediately disburse and distribute the estate to the persons entitled to it and file a closing statement as provided in AS

13.16.695

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Collateral references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d, Executors and Administrators, §§ 398, 996 et seq.

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Partition, §§ 46,
47,
103 — 105.

34 C.J.S., Executors and Administrators, §§ 482
— 535, 827
—
943.

Sec. 13.16.695.
Small estates; closing by sworn statement of personal representative.

Unless prohibited by order of the court and except for estates being administered by supervised personal representatives, a personal representative may close an estate administered under the summary procedures of AS

13.16.690

by filing with the court, at any time after disbursement and distribution of the estate, a verified statement stating that

to the best knowledge of the personal representative, the value of the entire estate, less liens and encumbrances, did not exceed homestead allowance, exempt property, family allowance, costs and expenses of administration, reasonable funeral expenses, and reasonable, necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last illness of the decedent;

the personal representative has fully administered the estate by disbursing and distributing it to the persons entitled to it; and

the personal representative has sent a copy of the closing statement to all distributees of the estate and to all creditors or other claimants of whom the personal representative is aware whose claims are neither paid nor barred and has furnished a full account in writing of the administration to the distributees whose interests are affected.

If no action or proceeding involving the personal representative is pending in the court one year after the closing statement is filed, the appointment of the personal representative terminates.

A closing statement filed under this section has the same effect as one filed under AS

13.16.630

.

The superior court may authorize the disposal in a manner it prescribes of personal property which has not been disposed of under this section by the end of six months if no heirs or claimants have been located.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.700.
Settlement directed by court.

When a judge receives information that a person has died in the judge’s judicial district leaving an estate with property limited to the property described under AS

13.16.680

(a)(1) or less and no qualified person has appeared to take charge of the assets, the judge may immediately appoint a person, corporation, or attorney to settle the estate in the manner provided for in AS

13.16.680

—

13.16.695

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective September 15, 2008, substituted “with property limited to the property described under AS

13.16.680(a)(1)

” for “of $15,000.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 37(a), ch. 100, SLA 2008, provides that the 2008 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to a decedent if the decedent dies on or after September 15, 2008.”

Sec. 13.16.705.
Inheritance of Native corporation stock.

The settlement common stock or other inalienable stock in a corporation organized under the laws of Alaska under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) is not subject to probate nor shall its value be considered in determining the value of an estate or allowance under this title. Upon death of the holder, if the stock does not pass by the testamentary disposition clause on the stock certificate or by the form authorized under (b) of this section, properly executed, it passes by will or intestate succession. In such a case, the determination of the person entitled to the stock shall be made by the corporation that initially issued the stock or its designated agent. The determination shall be made on the basis of an affidavit, furnished to the corporation that initially issued the stock, or its agent, showing the right of the person entitled to the stock to receive it. The affidavit, accepted in good faith by the corporation or its agent, has the same effect as an affidavit under AS

13.16.685

, and the person entitled to the stock, if the affidavit is not accepted, has the remedy set out in AS

13.16.685

. In case of dispute as to the person entitled to receive the stock, a person claiming ownership may bring an independent action in the superior court.

Unless a separate form is provided that substantially satisfies the requirements of this subsection and that is distributed to the same extent as the certificate, each certificate representing the stock shall bear provisions, on its reverse side, containing blanks to be filled in by the owner, constituting a last will and testament for the purposes of this section and 43 U.S.C. 1606(h) insofar as the shares represented by that certificate are concerned. The clause may be signed by the owner, dated, and notarized. This testamentary disposition may be changed from time to time or revoked, and it governs unless there is a subsequently executed certificate, form, or formal will making specific disposition of the stock.

When ownership of stock passes by devise or inheritance or as a result of court action, the stock shall be partitioned, insofar as practicable, in whole shares among those entitled to them.

If a deceased shareholder has failed to dispose of the stock by will and has no heirs under the applicable laws of intestacy, the shares escheat to the corporation.

The situs of the stock is Alaska.

This section applies to stock as long as the stock remains inalienable.

Where appropriate, terms used in this section have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

. In this section, “stock” means the settlement common stock or other inalienable stock of a corporation organized under the laws of the state under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), and includes membership in a corporation organized under AS 10.20 and inchoate rights to stock.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 1972; am §§ 17, 18 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 97 SLA 1974; am §§ 2, 3 ch 49 SLA 1991; am §§ 2 — 7 ch 60 SLA 1992; am §§ 18, 19 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.30.115.
Renumbered in 1972.

Subsection (f) enacted as (g).
Relettered in 1992, at which time former subsection (f) was relettered as (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 70, SLA 1972, provides: “Purpose.
It is the purpose of this Act to implement the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act (P.L. 92-203; 85 Stat. 688; 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.) by amending state law to resolve those ambiguities, conflicts and problems directly or impliedly created by the enactment by Congress of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act. It is also the purpose of this Act to complement through state policy, in a reasonable and fair manner, the federal policy expressed in that Act.”

Section 8, ch. 70, SLA 1972, as amended by § 2, ch. 83, SLA 1973, provides: “To the extent of an inconsistency between a provision of this Act or AS 10.05 or AS 10.20 and a provision of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act (P.L. 92-203; 85 Stat. 688; 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.) or a provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws required by the U.S. Secretary of the Interior under § 7(e) of the federal Act, the federal Act or the required provision in the articles or bylaws prevails with regard to a corporation organized under Alaska law pursuant to the federal Act.
However, nothing in this section or elsewhere in this Act deprives a corporation organized pursuant to § 14(h)(2) or (3) of the federal Act of any benefit provided for in this Act to any other type of corporation organized under Alaska law pursuant to the federal Act.
To the extent of an inconsistency between a provision of this Act and a provision of AS 10.05 or AS 10.20, this Act prevails with regard to a corporation organized under Alaska law pursuant to the federal Act.”